Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 3. Nomination by Petition

Applied

in

Blomquist v. Thomson, 591 F. Supp. 768, 1984 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 19379 (D. Wyo. 1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d Elections §§ 247 to 254.

29 C.J.S. Elections § 106.

§ 22-5-301.
Independent partisan candidates; form.

Independent candidates for partisan public offices may be nominated by filing a signed petition in substantially the following form:

PETITION FOR NOMINATION I, , swear or affirm that I was born on , (year), that I have been a resident of the State of Wyoming since , and that I am a registered voter of Election District No. , in Precinct No., County of, residing at , (if for the office of state senator or representative, commissioner or other district office) in Senate (House) (Commissioner or other) District , State of Wyoming, (if for the office of governor) and that I resided at the physical residential addresses listed below during the past five (5) years, and having obtained the number of signatures required by law for nomination by petition, I hereby request that my name be printed on the official ballot at the next general election as an independent candidate for the office of and declare that if nominated and elected, I will qualify for the office. (If for the office of United States senator or representative in congress) I have not, at any time when knowingly seeking nomination or election to this office, claimed or been currently claiming any residence or received the benefits of residency from any other state, excluding the benefits of residency related to or incidental from maintaining a residence at or near the United States capital. (If for the office of governor) I have resided at the following physical residential addresses during the past five (5) years: (Residence) (Date) 1. 2. Dated the day of , (year). (Signature) The eligible, registered electors supporting my nomination, and numbering not less than the number required under W.S.

22-5-304

, are as follows: (Signature) (Printed Name) (Residence) (Date) 1. 2. VERIFICATION BY CIRCULATORS I, , do hereby certify that I am a circulator of this petition, and I solely and personally circulated this petition, that all the signatures appearing herein were made in my presence from (month) (day), (year) through (month) (day), (year), and to the best of my knowledge and belief such signatures are those of the persons whose names they purport to be. (Signature)

Click to view

The petition shall be approved by the appropriate filing office prior to circulation.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-74; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1992, ch. 1, § 5; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 47, § 1; 2011, ch. 38, § 1; 2013 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2019 ch. 4, § 1, effective February 13, 2019; 2021 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), inserted “commissioner or other district office” and “(Commissioner or other)” in the form, and substituted “the number required under W.S.

22-5-304

” for “two percent (2%) of the total number of votes cast for Representative in Congress at the last general election in the political subdivision for which this petition is filed” in the second paragraph.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (b).

The 2014 amendment,

deleted “(Residence Address)” at the end of the form in (b).

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added "(If for the office of United States senator or representative in congress) I have not, at any time when knowingly seeking nomination or election to this office, claimed or been currently claiming any residence or received the benefits of residency from any other state, excluding the benefits of residency related to or incidental from maintaining a residence at or near the United States capital" in (a).

Independent candidate and new political party failed to show likelihood of success

on merits in challenge to statutory signature and deadline requirements. See Populist Party v. Herschler, 746 F.2d 656, 1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 17718 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of signer of petition to withdraw therefrom or revoke withdrawal, and time therefor, 27 ALR2d 604.

§ 22-5-302.
Unsuccessful primary candidates precluded.

An unsuccessful candidate for office at a primary election, whose name is printed on any party ballot, may not seek nomination by petition for the same office at the next general election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-75; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 47, § 1.

§ 22-5-303.
Restrictions on sponsors of independent candidates.

The name of a political group sponsoring an independent candidate shall not contain the name or any derivation of the name of any political party recognized under Wyoming law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-76; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

§ 22-5-304.
Qualifications and number of signers required.

For a statewide partisan office, a petition shall be signed by registered electors, resident in the state and eligible to vote for the petitioner, numbering not less than two percent (2%) of the total number of votes cast for representative in congress in the last general election for the entire state.

For a countywide partisan office, a petition shall be signed by registered electors, resident in the county and eligible to vote for the petitioner, numbering not less than two percent (2%) of the total number of votes cast for representative in congress in the last general election for the entire county.

For a district partisan election, a petition shall be signed by registered electors, resident in the district and eligible to vote for the petitioner, numbering not less than two percent (2%) of the total number of votes cast for the office in that particular district in the last general election. If a district’s boundaries have changed since the last general election, then the required number of petition signatures shall not be less than two percent (2%) of the number of registered voters in the current district boundaries at the close of day on the day immediately preceding the primary election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-77; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1992, ch. 1, § 5; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2011, ch. 38, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), inserted “For a statewide partisan office,” and substituted “state” for “legislative district or other district or political subdivision in which the petitioner will be a candidate,” “the petitioner” for “him,” and “entire state” for “political subdivision or legislative district for which the petition is filed”; and added (b) and (c).

§ 22-5-305.
When petitions may be circulated; use of copies; requirements.

A petition shall be circulated for signatures only during the calendar year in which the election for the office sought is to be held.

Copies of the petition may be circulated for signatures, but each separate page shall contain the information required to be contained in the original petition for nomination.

An elector signing a petition must also print on the petition:

The elector’s first and last name;

The date of signing the petition; and

The elector’s physical residential address.

The signature of an elector who has signed a petition in accordance with this section shall only count once per candidate toward the number of signatures required under W.S.

22-5-304

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-78; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2018 ch. 118, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2014 amendment,

in (c), substituted “print on the petition” for “write,” substituted “his residence” for “the residence,” and deleted “after his signature.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2018 amendment,

rewrote the existing language in (c),
which read: “An elector signing a petition must also print
on the petition his name, date and his residence address” and
redesignated it as the present introductory language of (c) and (c)(i)
through (c)(iii); and rewrote (d), which read: “The name of
one (1) voter signed to more than one (1) petition for nomination
to the same office shall not be counted on more than one (1) petition.”

Laws 2018,
ch. 118, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art.
4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

§ 22-5-306.
Where petitions to be filed; fee.

Petitions for nomination of independent candidates shall be filed in the office prescribed for nomination by primary election for such office.

Petitions must be accompanied by the same fee required for the same office of candidates seeking nomination by primary election. A petition not accompanied by the fee is not valid.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-79.

Cross references. —

For amount of filing fees, see §

22-5-208

.

§ 22-5-307.
Time for filing independent petitions.

Petitions filed with the secretary of state and with the county clerk shall be filed not less than seventy (70) days before a general election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-80; Laws 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

Independent candidate and new political party failed to show likelihood of success

on merits in challenge to statutory signature and deadline requirements. See Populist Party v. Herschler, 746 F.2d 656, 1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 17718 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1984).

§ 22-5-308.
Determining validity of petitions.

The secretary of state, or county clerk shall determine from the official list of registered electors whether sufficient valid signatures have been obtained on petitions filed in his office.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-81; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2.